bg-BG: Тип монтаж на сензора за масов въздушен поток: Със скоба; Фланцов монтаж; Линеен тръбен корпус; Друго/неизвестно; Само сензор (вложка); Сензор с корпус (вграден в корпуса); Друго
ko: 질량 공기 유량 센서 장착 유형: 클램프온; 플랜지 마운트; 인라인 튜브 하우징; 기타/알 수 없음; 센서 전용(인서트); 하우징 포함 센서(하우징 어셈블리); 기타
nb: Monteringstype for luftmassemåler: Klemme; Flensmontering; In-line rørhus; Annet/ukjent; Kun sensor (innsats); Sensor med hus (husenhet); Annet
fr: Type de montage du capteur de débit d’air massique: À pince; Montage sur bride; Boîtier tubulaire en ligne; Autre/inconnu; Capteur seul (insert); Capteur avec boîtier (assemblage de boîtier); Autre
fi: Ilmamassamittarin asennustyyppi: Kiinnitettävä; Laippakiinnitys; Putkikotelo; Muu/tuntematon; Vain anturi (upotettava); Anturi ja kotelo (kotelorakenne); Muu
cs: Typ montáže snímače hmotnostního průtoku vzduchu: Násuvný s objímkou; Přírubová montáž; In-line trubkové pouzdro; Jiné/neznámé; Pouze senzor (vložka); Senzor s krytem (sestava krytu); Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul de montare al senzorului de masă de aer: Prindere cu clemă; Montare pe flanșă; Carcasă tubulară în linie; Altele/necunoscut; Doar senzor (inserție); Senzor cu carcasă (ansamblu carcasă); Altele
tr: Kütle hava akış sensörü montaj tipi: Kelepçeli; Flanşlı montaj; Hat içi boru yuvası; Diğer/bilinmiyor; Yalnızca sensör (eklenti); Yuvalı sensör (yuva tertibatı); Diğer
sv: Monteringstyp för Flow: Klämfäste; Flänsmontering; In-line rörhus; Annat/okänt; Endast sensor (insats); Sensor med hölje (komplett hölje); Annat
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia snímača hmotnostného prietoku vzduchu: Nasúvacia (svorka); Prírubová montáž; V potrubí; Iný/neznámy; Iba snímač (vložka); Snímač so zapuzdrením (zostava krytu); Iný
hu: Légtömegmérő-érzékelő rögzítési típusa: Bilincses; Karimás rögzítés; Csővezetékbe építhető; Egyéb/ismeretlen; Csak érzékelő (betét); Érzékelő házzal (komplett egység); Egyéb
lt-LT: Oro masės srauto jutiklio montavimo tipas: Užspaudžiamas; Montuojamas su flanšu; Įleidžiamas į vamzdžio korpusą; Kita / nežinoma; Tik jutiklis (įdėklas); Jutiklis su korpusu (korpuso blokas); Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do sensor de fluxo de massa de ar: De fixação; Montagem em flange; Invólucro de tubo em linha; Outro/desconhecido; Apenas sensor (inserção); Sensor com invólucro (montagem de invólucro); Outro
pt-BR: Sensor de fluxo de ar em massa montagem tipo: Abraçadeira; Montagem em flange; Alojamento de tubo em linha; Outro/Desconhecido; Apenas sensor (inserção); Sensor com alojamento (conjunto de alojamento); Outro
pl: Typ montażu czujnika masowego przepływu powietrza: Zaciskowy; Montaż kołnierzowy; Obudowa rurkowa in-line; Inne/nieznane; Tylko czujnik (wkładka); Czujnik z obudową; Inne
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งเซ็นเซอร์วัดปริมาณอากาศ: แคลมป์; หน้าแปลน; ตัวเรือนแบบท่ออินไลน์; อื่นๆ/ไม่ทราบ; เฉพาะเซ็นเซอร์ (สอด); เซ็นเซอร์พร้อมตัวเรือน (ชุดตัวเรือน); อื่นๆ
da: Monteringstype for luftstrømssensoren: Påklemning; Flangemontering; In-line rørhus; Andet/ukendt; Kun sensor (indsats); Sensor med hus (hussamling); Andet
it: Tipo di montaggio del sensore di portata d'aria: A morsetto; A flangia; Alloggiamento tubolare in linea; Altro/sconosciuto; Solo sensore (inserto); Sensore con alloggiamento (gruppo alloggiamento); Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže Flow protoka zraka: Stezaljka; Prirubnica; Linijsko kućište cijevi; Ostalo/nepoznato; Samo senzor (umetak); Senzor s kućištem (sklop kućišta); Ostalo
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt cảm biến lưu lượng khí: Kẹp; Giá gắn bích; Vỏ ống nối tiếp; Khác/không rõ; Chỉ cảm biến (đầu cắm); Cảm biến kèm vỏ (cụm vỏ); Khác
es: Tipo de montaje del sensor de flujo de masa de aire: Abrazadera; Montaje de brida; Carcasa de tubo en línea; Otro/desconocido; Solo sensor (inserto); Sensor con carcasa (ensamblaje de carcasa); Otro
nl: Mass air flow sensor bevestigingstype: Klembevestiging; Flensmontage; In-line buisbehuizing; Overig/onbekend; Alleen sensor (insteek); Sensor met behuizing (behuizing-assemblage); Overige
ru: Тип крепления датчика массового расхода воздуха: Хомутный; Фланцевый; Встроенный трубчатый корпус; Другое/неизвестно; Только датчик (вставка); Датчик в сборе с корпусом; Другое
de: Montageart des Luftmassenmessers: Zum Anklemmen; Flanschmontage; Inline-Rohrgehäuse; Sonstige/Unbekannt; Nur Sensor (Einsatz); Sensor mit Gehäuse (Gehäusebaugruppe); Sonstiges
zh-CN: 空气质量流量传感器安装类型: 夹钳式; 法兰安装; 直列式管壳; 其他/未知; 仅传感器（插入式）; 带外壳的传感器（外壳总成）; 其他
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης αισθητήρα ροής αέρα: Με σφιγκτήρα; Τοποθέτηση με φλάντζα; Περίβλημα σωλήνα in-line; Άλλο/άγνωστο; Μόνο αισθητήρας (ένθετο); Αισθητήρας με περίβλημα (συγκρότημα περιβλήματος); Άλλο
ja: マスFlowセンサーの取り付けタイプ: クランプオン; フランジマウント; インラインチューブハウジング; その他/不明; センサーのみ (インサート); ハウジング付きセンサー (ハウジングアセンブリ); その他
en: Mass air flow sensor mounting type: Clamp-on; Flange mount; In-line tube housing; Other/unknown; Sensor only (insert); Sensor with housing (housing assembly); Other
zh-TW: 空氣質量流量感測器安裝類型: 夾具安裝; 法蘭安裝; 直列式管路外殼; 其他/未知; 僅感測器 (插入式); 含外殼感測器 (外殼組件); 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže senzorja masnega pretoka zraka (MAF): Na sponko; Prirobnična montaža; Cevno ohišje; Drugo/neznano; Samo senzor (vstavek); Senzor z ohišjem (sklop ohišja); Drugo